Washington statutes.
RCW 34.05.598

Frivolous petitions.

The provisions of RCW 4.84.185 relating to civil actions that are frivolous and advanced without reasonable cause apply to petitions for judicial review under this chapter.

[ 1988 c 288 s 607.]